Maryland, session 2025, HB1215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–26.1.
(f) (1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the governing
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1215*

HOUSE BILL 1215
body of a cooperative housing corporation shall provide funds to the reserve in accordance
with the most recent reserve study and shall review the reserve study annually for
accuracy.
(ii) If the most recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the
governing body shall, within [3] 5 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial
reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve funding level recommended in the
initial reserve study.
(2) The governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has the
authority to increase an assessment levied to cover the reserve funding amount required
under this section, notwithstanding any provision of the articles of incorporation, bylaws,
or proprietary lease restricting assessment increases or capping the assessment that may
be levied in a fiscal year.
Article – Real Property
11–109.2.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the reserves provided for in
the annual budget under subsection (b) of this section for a residential condominium shall
be the funding amount recommended in the most recent reserve study completed under §
11–109.4 of this title.
(2) If the most recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the
governing body shall, within [3] 5 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial
reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve funding level recommended in the
initial reserve study.
11B–112.2.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, reserves provided for in the
annual budget under subsection (c) of this section shall be the funding amount
recommended in the most recent reserve study completed under § 11B–112.3 of this title.
(2) If the most recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the
governing body shall, within [3] 5 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial
reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve funding level recommended in the
initial reserve study.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.